Hawaii statutes.
[§539-10] Terms, conditions, and forms for
registration. (a) A registering entity offering to accept registrations
in beneficiary form may establish the terms and conditions under which it will
receive requests (1) for registrations in beneficiary form, and (2) for
implementation of registrations in beneficiary form, including requests for
cancellation of previously registered transfer-on-death beneficiary
designations and requests for reregistration to effect a change of
beneficiary. The terms and conditions so established may provide for proving
death, avoiding or resolving any problems concerning fractional shares,
designating primary and contingent beneficiaries, and substituting a named
beneficiary's descendants to take in the place of the named beneficiary in the
event of the beneficiary's death. Substitution may be indicated by appending to
the name of the primary beneficiary the letters "LDPS", standing for
"lineal descendants per stirpes". This designation substitutes a deceased
beneficiary's descendants who survive the owner for a beneficiary who fails to
so survive, the descendants to be identified and to share in accordance with
the law of the beneficiary's domicile at the owner's death governing
inheritance by descendants of an intestate. Other forms of identifying
beneficiaries who are to take on one or more contingencies, and rules for
providing proofs and assurances needed to satisfy reasonable concerns by
registering entities regarding conditions and identities relevant to accurate
implementation of registrations in beneficiary form, may be contained in a
registering entity's terms and conditions.

(b) The following are illustrations of
registrations in beneficiary form which a registering entity may authorize:

(1) Sole owner-sole beneficiary: John S. Brown TOD
(or POD) John S. Brown Jr.;

(2) Multiple owners-sole beneficiary: John S. Brown
Mary B. Brown JT TEN TOD John S. Brown Jr.;

(3) Multiple owners-primary and secondary
(substituted) beneficiaries: John S. Brown Mary B. Brown JT TEN TOD John S.
Brown Jr. SUB BENE Peter Q. Brown or John S. Brown Mary B. Brown JT TEN TOD
John S. Brown Jr. LDPS. [L 1998, c 63, pt of §1]

Cross References

Representation; per capita at each generation; per stirpes,
see §560:2-709.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next